tests/noms.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] tones":
    
    bə̀lòŋ<n><cl5><sg><pos> : bə̀lǒŋ
    bə̀lòŋ<n><cl5><pl><pos> : bə̀lǒŋ
    bə̀lòŋ<n><cl5><sg> : bə̀lòŋ
    bə̀lòŋ<n><cl5><pl> : bə̀lòŋ
    cɔ̀<n><cl5><sg><pos> : cɔ̌
    cɔ̀<n><cl5><pl><pos> : cɔ̌
    cɔ̀<n><cl5><sg> : cɔ̀
    cɔ̀<n><cl5><pl> : cɔ̀
    ka<n><cl1><sg> : ka
    ka<n><cl1><sg><pos> : kâ
    kù<n><cl3><sg><pos> : kǔ
    kù<n><cl3><sg> : kù
    ka<n><cl4><pl> : nka
    ka<n><cl4><pl><pos> : nkâ
    kù<n><cl4><pl><pos> : nkǔ
    kù<n><cl4><pl> : nkù
    mɛn<n><cl3><sg> : mɛn
    mɛn<n><cl3><sg><pos> : mɛ̂n
    mɛn<n><cl6><pl> : bon
    mɛn<n><cl6><pl><pos> : bôn
